public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A ir éo/J desavir
SFX A ir éo/J dir
SFX A ir éo/J interiŧir
SFX A ir éo/J interlokuir
SFX A ir éo/J intiriŧir
SFX A ir éo/J karpir
SFX A ir éo/J perseguir
SFX A ir éo/J pervertir
SFX A ir éo/J rokir
SFX A ir éo/J seguir
SFX A ir éo/J servir
SFX A ir éo/J superbir
SFX A ir éo/J teñir
SFX A ir éo/J vertir
SFX A ir éo/J veñir
SFX A ir éo/J xeguir
SFX A ir éo/J ŧernir
SFX A ir éo/J ŧerpir
SFX A ir éo/J ŧirkuir
SFX A ir éo/J ŧokir
SFX A ir éomi/K [acfgjlmosxđ]ir
SFX A ir éomi/K [adfgioptu]rir
SFX A ir éomi/K [aeilnosu]tir
SFX A ir éomi/K [aeinu]kir
SFX A ir éomi/K [aeiou]nir
SFX A ir éomi/K [aeiu]bir
SFX A ir éomi/K [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir éomi/K [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A ir éomi/K [anou]pir
SFX A ir éomi/K [ao]rdir
SFX A ir éomi/K [ao]rnir
SFX A ir éomi/K [ao]rtir
SFX A ir éomi/K [aou]rbir
SFX A ir éomi/K [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A ir éomi/K [blnrt]uir
SFX A ir éomi/K [fsx]ierir
SFX A ir éomi/K [ft]erdir
SFX A ir éomi/K [nr]guir
SFX A ir éomi/K [pt]erveñir
SFX A ir éomi/K arveñir
SFX A ir éomi/K derokir
SFX A ir éomi/K desavir
SFX A ir éomi/K dir
SFX A ir éomi/K interiŧir
SFX A ir éomi/K interlokuir
SFX A ir éomi/K intiriŧir
SFX A ir éomi/K karpir
SFX A ir éomi/K perseguir
SFX A ir éomi/K pervertir
SFX A ir éomi/K rokir
SFX A ir éomi/K seguir
SFX A ir éomi/K servir
SFX A ir éomi/K superbir
SFX A ir éomi/K teñir
SFX A ir éomi/K vertir
SFX A ir éomi/K veñir
SFX A ir éomi/K xeguir
SFX A ir éomi/K ŧernir
SFX A ir éomi/K ŧerpir
SFX A ir éomi/K ŧirkuir
SFX A ir éomi/K ŧokir
SFX A ir ésimo [acfgjlmosxđ]ir
SFX A ir ésimo [adfgioptu]rir
SFX A ir ésimo [aeilnosu]tir
SFX A ir ésimo [aeinu]kir
SFX A ir ésimo [aeiou]nir
SFX A ir ésimo [aeiu]bir
SFX A ir ésimo [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir ésimo [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A ir ésimo [anou]pir
SFX A ir ésimo [ao]rdir
SFX A ir ésimo [ao]rnir
SFX A ir ésimo [ao]rtir
SFX A ir ésimo [aou]rbir
SFX A ir ésimo [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A ir ésimo [blnrt]uir
SFX A ir ésimo [fsx]ierir
SFX A ir ésimo [ft]erdir
SFX A ir ésimo [nr]guir
SFX A ir ésimo [pt]erveñir
SFX A ir ésimo arveñir
SFX A ir ésimo derokir
SFX A ir ésimo desavir
SFX A ir ésimo dir
SFX A ir ésimo interiŧir
SFX A ir ésimo interlokuir
SFX A ir ésimo intiriŧir
SFX A ir ésimo karpir
SFX A ir ésimo perseguir
SFX A ir ésimo pervertir
SFX A ir ésimo rokir
SFX A ir ésimo seguir
SFX A ir ésimo servir
SFX A ir ésimo superbir
SFX A ir ésimo teñir
SFX A ir ésimo vertir
SFX A ir ésimo veñir
SFX A ir ésimo xeguir
SFX A ir ésimo ŧernir
SFX A ir ésimo ŧerpir
SFX A ir ésimo ŧirkuir
SFX A ir ésimo ŧokir
SFX A ir éu/Q [ps]entir
SFX A ir éu/Q [pt]erveñir
SFX A ir éu/Q arveñir
SFX A ir éu/Q dormir
SFX A ir éu/Q ensir
SFX A ir éu/Q esir
SFX A ir éu/Q frir
SFX A ir éu/Q mentir
SFX A ir éu/Q morir
SFX A ir éu/Q nguir
SFX A ir éu/Q parir
SFX A ir éu/Q partir
SFX A ir éu/Q perseguir
SFX A ir éu/Q pervertir
SFX A ir éu/Q salir
SFX A ir éu/Q seguir
SFX A ir éu/Q servir
SFX A ir éu/Q sorbir
SFX A ir éu/Q teñir
SFX A ir éu/Q vertir
SFX A ir éu/Q vestir
SFX A ir éu/Q veñir
SFX A ir éu/Q xeguir
SFX A ir évami/K [acfgjlmosxđ]ir
SFX A ir évami/K [adfgioptu]rir
SFX A ir évami/K [aeilnosu]tir
SFX A ir évami/K [aeinu]kir
SFX A ir évami/K [aeiou]nir
SFX A ir évami/K [aeiu]bir
SFX A ir évami/K [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir évami/K [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A ir évami/K [anou]pir
SFX A ir évami/K [ao]rdir
SFX A ir évami/K [ao]rnir
SFX A ir évami/K [ao]rtir
SFX A ir évami/K [aou]rbir
SFX A ir évami/K [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A ir évami/K [blnrt]uir
SFX A ir évami/K [fsx]ierir
SFX A ir évami/K [ft]erdir
SFX A ir évami/K [nr]guir
SFX A ir évami/K [pt]erveñir
SFX A ir évami/K arveñir
SFX A ir évami/K derokir
SFX A ir évami/K desavir
SFX A ir évami/K dir
SFX A ir évami/K interiŧir
SFX A ir évami/K interlokuir
SFX A ir évami/K intiriŧir
SFX A ir évami/K karpir
SFX A ir évami/K perseguir
SFX A ir évami/K pervertir
SFX A ir évami/K rokir
SFX A ir évami/K seguir
SFX A ir évami/K servir
SFX A ir évami/K superbir
SFX A ir évami/K teñir
SFX A ir évami/K vertir
SFX A ir évami/K veñir
SFX A ir évami/K xeguir
SFX A ir évami/K ŧernir
SFX A ir évami/K ŧerpir
SFX A ir évami/K ŧirkuir
SFX A ir évami/K ŧokir
SFX A ir évelo/S [acfgjlmosxđ]ir
SFX A ir évelo/S [adfgioptu]rir
SFX A ir évelo/S [aeilnosu]tir
SFX A ir évelo/S [aeinu]kir
SFX A ir évelo/S [aeiou]nir
SFX A ir évelo/S [aeiu]bir
SFX A ir évelo/S [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir évelo/S [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A ir évelo/S [anou]pir
SFX A ir évelo/S [ao]rdir
SFX A ir évelo/S [ao]rnir
SFX A ir évelo/S [ao]rtir
SFX A ir évelo/S [aou]rbir
SFX A ir évelo/S [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A ir évelo/S [blnrt]uir
SFX A ir évelo/S [fsx]ierir
SFX A ir évelo/S [ft]erdir
SFX A ir évelo/S [nr]guir
SFX A ir évelo/S [pt]erveñir
SFX A ir évelo/S arveñir
SFX A ir évelo/S derokir
SFX A ir évelo/S desavir
SFX A ir évelo/S dir
SFX A ir évelo/S interiŧir
SFX A ir évelo/S interlokuir
SFX A ir évelo/S intiriŧir
SFX A ir évelo/S karpir
SFX A ir évelo/S perseguir
SFX A ir évelo/S pervertir
SFX A ir évelo/S rokir
SFX A ir évelo/S seguir
SFX A ir évelo/S servir
SFX A ir évelo/S superbir
SFX A ir évelo/S teñir
SFX A ir évelo/S vertir
SFX A ir évelo/S veñir
SFX A ir évelo/S xeguir
SFX A ir évelo/S ŧernir
SFX A ir évelo/S ŧerpir
SFX A ir évelo/S ŧirkuir
SFX A ir évelo/S ŧokir
SFX A ir évemi/K [acfgjlmosxđ]ir
SFX A ir évemi/K [adfgioptu]rir
SFX A ir évemi/K [aeilnosu]tir
SFX A ir évemi/K [aeinu]kir
SFX A ir évemi/K [aeiou]nir
SFX A ir évemi/K [aeiu]bir
SFX A ir évemi/K [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir évemi/K [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A ir évemi/K [anou]pir
SFX A ir évemi/K [ao]rdir
SFX A ir évemi/K [ao]rnir
SFX A ir évemi/K [ao]rtir
SFX A ir évemi/K [aou]rbir
SFX A ir évemi/K [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A ir évemi/K [blnrt]uir
SFX A ir évemi/K [fsx]ierir
SFX A ir évemi/K [ft]erdir
SFX A ir évemi/K [nr]guir
SFX A ir évemi/K [pt]erveñir
SFX A ir évemi/K arveñir
SFX A ir évemi/K derokir
SFX A ir évemi/K desavir
SFX A ir évemi/K dir
SFX A ir évemi/K interiŧir
SFX A ir évemi/K interlokuir
SFX A ir évemi/K intiriŧir
SFX A ir évemi/K karpir
SFX A ir évemi/K perseguir
SFX A ir évemi/K pervertir
SFX A ir évemi/K rokir
SFX A ir évemi/K seguir
SFX A ir évemi/K servir
SFX A ir évemi/K superbir
SFX A ir évemi/K teñir
SFX A ir évemi/K vertir
SFX A ir évemi/K veñir
SFX A ir évemi/K xeguir
SFX A ir évemi/K ŧernir
SFX A ir évemi/K ŧerpir
SFX A ir évemi/K ŧirkuir
SFX A ir évemi/K ŧokir
SFX A ir évimo/L [acfgjlmosxđ]ir
SFX A ir évimo/L [adfgioptu]rir
SFX A ir évimo/L [aeilnosu]tir
SFX A ir évimo/L [aeinu]kir
SFX A ir évimo/L [aeiou]nir
SFX A ir évimo/L [aeiu]bir
SFX A ir évimo/L [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir évimo/L [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A ir évimo/L [anou]pir
SFX A ir évimo/L [ao]rdir
SFX A ir évimo/L [ao]rnir
SFX A ir évimo/L [ao]rtir
SFX A ir évimo/L [aou]rbir
SFX A ir évimo/L [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A ir évimo/L [blnrt]uir
SFX A ir évimo/L [fsx]ierir
SFX A ir évimo/L [ft]erdir
SFX A ir évimo/L [nr]guir
SFX A ir évimo/L [pt]erveñir
SFX A ir évimo/L arveñir
SFX A ir évimo/L derokir
SFX A ir évimo/L desavir
SFX A ir évimo/L dir
SFX A ir évimo/L interiŧir
SFX A ir évimo/L interlokuir
SFX A ir évimo/L intiriŧir
SFX A ir évimo/L karpir
SFX A ir évimo/L perseguir
SFX A ir évimo/L pervertir
SFX A ir évimo/L rokir
SFX A ir évimo/L seguir
SFX A ir évimo/L servir
SFX A ir évimo/L superbir
SFX A ir évimo/L teñir
SFX A ir évimo/L vertir
SFX A ir évimo/L veñir
SFX A ir évimo/L xeguir
SFX A ir évimo/L ŧernir
SFX A ir évimo/L ŧerpir
SFX A ir évimo/L ŧirkuir
SFX A ir évimo/L ŧokir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [acfgjlmosxđ]ir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [adfgioptu]rir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [aeilnosu]tir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [aeinu]kir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [aeiou]nir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [aeiu]bir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [anou]pir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [ao]rdir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [ao]rnir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [ao]rtir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [aou]rbir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [blnrt]uir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [fsx]ierir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [ft]erdir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [nr]guir
SFX A ir évimoni/M [pt]erveñir
SFX A ir évimoni/M arveñir
SFX A ir évimoni/M derokir
SFX A ir évimoni/M desavir
SFX A ir évimoni/M dir
SFX A ir évimoni/M interiŧir
