public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.dic
dexabitar/A
alar/A
dexalborar/A
inalŧar/A
analiđar/A
angosiar/A
ardir/A
arkar/A
artikolar/A
adatar/A
exautorar/A
badinar/A
inbakukir/A
balordir/A
inbanbolar/A
xbarakar/A
xbarkar/A
bastonar/A
inbaukar/A
xbefar/A
inberlar/A
xbevaŧar/A
xbigatar/A
dexbirar/A
xbixegar/A
xboɉentar/A
bolsar/A
inbonbaxar/A
inboreŧar/A
dexbotonar/A
bragar/A
sbrankar/A
inbrenar/A
xbrodegar/A
bronbar/A
bruskinar/A
buratar/A
buxarar/A
scarar/A
scentrar/A
koncéñer/A
cincinar/A
benedir/A
daŧiar/A
depénxer/A
prodigar/A
dixnar/A
domestegar/A
indorar/A
dreŧar/A
reprodúxer/A
đontar/A
konđurar/A
eliminar/A
estaxiar/A
exímer/A
strafar/A
sfaldar/A
fanfuñar/A
infastidir/A
bonifegar/A
sofegar/A
defenestrar/A
sferdir/A
dexinfiar/A
sfiapir/A
figurar/A
afinar/A
sfioređar/A
desfitar/A
desfogar/A
refolar/A
inforkar/A
informigolar/A
frakar/A
infrapolar/A
fraŧionar/A
frexiar/A
konfrontar/A
sfugaŧar/A
infuriar/A
dexgaɉar/A
inganar/A
ingarbir/A
xgaruɉar/A
xgaxolar/A
ingolfar/A
xgorgonar/A
xgramolar/A
xgrankir/A
dexagravar/A
ingrespar/A
xgriñaŧar/A
xgrongolar/A
guantar/A
guarnir/A
guxar/A
indatejar/A
iniŧiar/A
inrikir/A
intrivelar/A
abiurar/A
dexɉaŧar/A
inɉòter/A
deskàder/A
skagaŧar/A
rekalkar/A
inkalŧar/A
akanar/A
kanforar/A
inkantexemar/A
deskapelar/A
deskapujar/A
inkargar/A
skarpir/A
skartoŧar/A
katar/A
skatonar/A
inkavar/A
kaxamentar/A
skòder/A
inkokalir/A
kolorar/A
inkomenŧiar/A
konéter/A
konpañar/A
skontar/A
deskonŧar/A
kórer/A
deskordar/A
korèxer/A
kosar/A
skoŧonar/A
strakréder/A
skrikar/A
deskrostar/A
kuacar/A
inkuercar/A
skuinternar/A
kunar/A
traskurar/A
kuxinar/A
lanŧar/A
stralasar/A
xlavaŧar/A
xlénđer/A
levar/A
ekuilibrar/A
limegar/A
livelar/A
dexloɉar/A
xloxar/A
dexluviar/A
magañar/A
maliñar/A
manedar/A
manteđar/A
xmaraŧar/A
xmaronar/A
dexmaskarar/A
matiđar/A
maxarir/A
xmeđar/A
amendar/A
inxmerdar/A
inprométer/A
parametriđar/A
deminuir/A
inmobiliar/A
xmolar/A
mónđer/A
morir/A
xmorfir/A
demostrar/A
muar/A
mular/A
mustacar/A
xmuxegar/A
inaspar/A
inegrir/A
ninegar/A
renonŧiar/A
nuvolar/A
dexobedir/A
oɉar/A
inonbrar/A
ontolar/A
straordenar/A
ortrigar/A
pacar/A
padroneđar/A
inpaketar/A
paliđar/A
inpaludar/A
panteđar/A
inparar/A
pariđar/A
skonpartir/A
paseɉar/A
pasturar/A
inpatriarkar/A
inpavionar/A
despegolar/A
inpelukar/A
pénđer/A
dispensar/A
peotar/A
perletar/A
petar/A
inpetolar/A
peverar/A
piànđer/A
despiegar/A
inpikolir/A
spionbar/A
pisar/A
piŧegar/A
konplikar/A
spolpar/A
antepóner/A
rekonpóner/A
apontar/A
pónxer/A
inportar/A
spostar/A
poxar/A
prénder/A
despreŧiar/A
profetiđar/A
publegar/A
espurgar/A
puxar/A
rakolar/A
deramar/A
ranđar/A
ratinar/A
recotar/A
remengar/A
rexentar/A
rikir/A
rixegar/A
roesar/A
rolar/A
roñar/A
roveɉar/A
rugar/A
ruskar/A
insabionar/A
konsakrar/A
salmastrar/A
insalviar/A
desapunir/A
savarɉar/A
scopar/A
insekir/A
konseguir/A
suseguitar/A
inselvadegir/A
insensar/A
inseñar/A
serbar/A
malsestar/A
sialar/A
trasimar/A
siropar/A
skakañar/A
skarar/A
skarsexar/A
skerŧar/A
skoetar/A
skreŧolar/A
skuarŧar/A
solar/A
insolfar/A
insonar/A
sorbir/A
spalankar/A
ispaxemar/A
spergoŧar/A
sospetar/A
spiocar/A
resplénder/A
spronar/A
movestar/A
istalar/A
stañar/A
destenar/A
destínguer/A
sostituir/A
restorar/A
stranbar/A
strepitar/A
kostruir/A
destrúxer/A
stupidir/A
sufitar/A
sunar/A
sutilar/A
detajar/A
destakar/A
tanbaskar/A
taraŧar/A
tartajar/A
destavelar/A
telefonar/A
sotinténder/A
tenporiđar/A
ténxer/A
konteñir/A
otèñer/A
mantéñer/A
terapienar/A
detestar/A
intimorir/A
tiraniđar/A
toler/A
toneđar/A
intorbidir/A
stornar/A
tosir/A
destràer/A
trakejar/A
trankuiliđar/A
estratar/A
estràxer/A
destresar/A
intrigar/A
tromentar/A
introxar/A
turbiar/A
inŧangolar/A
proŧéder/A
ŧentraliđar/A
ŧerkar/A
eŧetuar/A
ŧigolar/A
antiŧipar/A
ŧokolar/A
inŧupar/A
urmar/A
uŧar/A
uxurar/A
prevaler/A
vanpir/A
varentar/A
desprovéder/A
veɉar/A
venar/A
ventiđar/A
deskonveñir/A
devèñer/A
resovèñer/A
xvergolar/A
malversar/A
pervèrter/A
investigar/A
invidar/A
vinkolar/A
viŧiar/A
revixionar/A
evokar/A
voltar/A
invòlxer/A
inxakolar/A
xavaɉar/A
xbrisar/A
inxentilir/A
xgurar/A
xlitar/A
xoetar/A
rexultar/A
